Hawaii statutes.
[§302L-7] Executive office on early
learning public prekindergarten program; public preschools. (a) There is
established within the early learning system an early childhood education
program to be known as the executive office on early learning public prekindergarten
program and to be administered by the office pursuant to rules adopted by the
office. The program shall:

(1) Be provided through the executive office on early
learning, which may partner with the department of education;

(2) Prepare children for school and active
participation in society through the use of either of the State's two official
languages; and

(3) Provide access to high-quality early childhood
education that addresses children's physical, cognitive, linguistic, social,
and emotional development.

(b) The program shall serve children in the
year prior to the year of kindergarten eligibility, with priority extended to
underserved or at-risk children, as defined in section 302L-1. The department
of education may grant geographic exceptions for children to attend prekindergarten
outside their assigned service area, as the department of education deems
appropriate; provided that the department of education shall grant a request
for geographic exception to attend a prekindergarten in another service area if
the request is based on the employment location of the parent or guardian of
the student.

(c) Enrollment in the program shall be
voluntary. A child who is enrolled in, or is eligible to attend, a public
elementary school, or who is required to attend school pursuant to section
302A-1132, shall not be eligible for enrollment in the program.

(d) The program shall incorporate high-quality
standards pursuant to rules adopted by the office. High-quality standards
shall be research-based, developmentally-appropriate practices associated with
better educational outcomes for children, such as:

(1) Positive teacher-child interactions;

(2) Use of individual child assessments that are used
for ongoing instructional planning, based upon all areas of childhood
development and learning, including cognitive, linguistic, social, and
emotional approaches to learning and health and physical development;

(3) Family engagement; and

(4) Alignment with the Hawaii early learning and
development standards, which align with department of education standards,
state content and performance standards, and general learner outcomes for
grades kindergarten to twelve, to facilitate a seamless and high-quality
educational experience for children.

The office shall monitor implementation of the
high-quality educational experience for children.

(e) The office shall provide support to
incorporate these high-quality standards, including support related to
teacher-child interactions, individual child assessments, and family
engagement.

(f) The office shall coordinate with other
agencies and programs to facilitate comprehensive services for early childhood
education.

(g) The office shall collect data to:

(1) Evaluate the services provided;

(2) Inform policy; and

(3) Make any improvements to the program.

(h) The department of education and any public
charter school existing pursuant to chapter 302D, may use available classrooms
for public preschool programs statewide. The office shall give priority to public
charter schools that serve high populations of underserved or at-risk
children. Preschool classrooms established pursuant to this section shall be
in addition to any classrooms used for the pre-plus program established
pursuant to section 302L-1.7.

(i) The office shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, including
compliance with all applicable state and federal laws. [L 2015, c 109, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next